Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXVIII Mines and Minerals
CHAPTER 351 Department for Natural Resources
351.1041.
Mine Safety Review Commission.

The Mine Safety Review Commission is created as an independent governmental entity attached to the Energy and Environment Cabinet, Office of the Secretary, for administrative purposes. The commission shall:

Conduct hearings and issue orders regarding a licensee, coal operation, or other person involved in the mining of coal in accordance with KRS

351.194

;

Jointly with the department establish a process for the department’s referral of allegations of mine safety violations, allegations of unsafe working conditions, violation of a miner’s drug- and alcohol-free condition of certification, or supervisory personnel’s failure to immediately report a fatal accident or an accident involving serious physical injury to the commission for adjudication;

Make any recommendations to the department that it believes appropriate upon its review, consideration, and analysis of:

All reports of coal mining fatalities and serious physical injuries provided by the commissioner under KRS 351.070(14);

Any case in which a miner or a mine owner or operator, in the professional opinion of the department has a history of significant and substantial safety violations even though there has been no serious physical injury or death resulting from the violations;

Any case in which a miner or a mine owner or operator has been convicted of a criminal charge for a violation of a federal mine safety standard or standards; and

Any case in which the Federal Mine Safety and Health Administration has made a recommendation relating to certification of an individual certified under this chapter.

The Mine Safety Review Commission shall consist of three (3) members appointed by the Governor subject to the consent of the Senate and the House of Representatives in accordance with KRS

11.160

. Of the members of the Mine Safety Review Commission first appointed under this section, one (1) shall be appointed for a term of one (1) year; one (1) shall be appointed for a term of two (2) years; and one (1) shall be appointed for a term of three (3) years. After the initial appointments, members of the commission shall be appointed for terms of four (4) years. A member may be reappointed at the expiration of his or her previous term. Members shall continue to serve until a successor is appointed and qualified.

The members of the Mine Safety Review Commission shall have the qualifications required of Judges of the Court of Appeals, except for residence in a district, and shall be subject to the same standards of conduct made applicable to a part-time judge by the Rules of the Kentucky Supreme Court. The members shall receive the per diem equivalent of the salary of a Judge of the Court of Appeals for each day spent in conducting the business of the commission.

The Governor shall designate a member of the Mine Safety Review Commission to serve as chair and shall fill any vacancy in the office of chair.

The Governor may remove any member for good cause, including violation of the Code of Judicial Conduct and repeated failure to perform satisfactorily the specific duties assigned in this chapter or KRS Chapter 352. The Governor may remove the member only after furnishing him or her with a written copy of the charges against that member and holding a public hearing if requested by the member.

The commission shall meet on the call of the chair or a majority of the members of the commission.

The Energy and Environment Cabinet shall provide administrative services to the Mine Safety Review Commission. If the commission deems it necessary to employ hearing officers to assist it, the Energy and Environment Cabinet shall employ hearing officers to assist the commission in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B and this chapter, notwithstanding the provisions of KRS 13B.030(2)(b).

The commission may conduct hearings, compel the attendance of witnesses, administer oaths, and conduct oversight activities as may be required to ensure the full implementation of its duties.

The department shall provide the Mine Safety Review Commission with all information requested by the commission for the fulfillment of its responsibilities under this chapter and KRS Chapter 352.

The secretary of the Energy and Environment Cabinet shall effectuate the hiring of any staff deemed necessary and affordable for the efficient operations of the Mine Safety Review Commission. This may include an executive director, general counsel, or other administrative support positions, to be appointed in accordance with KRS

12.010

and

12.050

.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2001, ch. 149, § 2, effective March 20, 2001; 2002, ch. 353, § 1, effective July 15, 2002; 2006, ch. 241, § 12, effective July 12, 2006; 2007, ch. 94, § 5, effective June 26, 2007; 2010, ch. 24, § 1898, effective July 15, 2010; 2017 ch. 117, § 34, effective June 29, 2017.

351.1045.
Required new miner training course and site visits for members of the Mine Safety Review Commission.

The members of the Mine Safety Review Commission shall complete a forty (40) hour new miner training course if they have not completed the course within the previous two (2) years. In addition, they shall participate in a site visit of an underground mine and a surface coal mine and thereafter make a site visit of an underground mine at least every three (3) years.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2001, ch. 149, § 7, effective March 20, 2001; 2017 ch. 117, § 35, effective June 29, 2017.

351.105.
Mining Board — Membership — Hearings — Administrative regulations. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 8, § 5; 1978, ch. 301, § 4, effective June 17, 1978; 1980, ch. 380, § 1, effective July 15, 1980; 1996, ch. 308, § 7, effective April 9, 1996; 2000, ch. 104, § 7, effective July 14, 2000; 2001, ch. 149, § 5, effective March 20, 2001; 2015 ch. 87, § 15, effective June 24, 2015; repealed by 2017 ch. 117, § 49, effective June 29, 2017.

351.1055.
Mine Equipment Review Panel — Membership — Recommendations. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 2006, ch. 185, § 4, effective July 12, 2006; 2007, ch. 94, § 6, effective June 26, 2007; 2010, ch. 24, § 1899, effective July 15, 2010; 2010, ch. 135, § 10, effective July 15, 2010; 2015 ch. 87, § 14, effective June 24, 2015; repealed by 2017 ch. 117, § 49, effective June 29, 2017.

351.106.
Education and training program — Alcohol and substance abuse training and education — Retraining and reeducation requirements — Administrative regulations — Implementation of program for training and examination — Records.

The department shall establish criteria and standards for a program of education and training to be required of prospective miners, miners, and all certified persons. This education and training shall be provided in a manner determined by the commissioner to be adequate to meet the standards established by the department, which shall include as a minimum the requirements of KRS

351.102

and the requirements of the federal government for the training of miners for new work assignments, and at least sixteen (16) hours of annual retraining and reeducation for all certified persons, of which thirty (30) minutes annually shall be dedicated to alcohol and substance abuse education. Effective January 1, 2009, in addition, six (6) hours of annual training on changes in mine safety laws, safe retreat mining practices, disciplinary cases litigated before the Mine Safety Review Commission, changes in mine safety technology, and ways to improve safe working procedures shall be required for all mine foremen. This annual training for mine foremen shall be provided exclusively by the division.

One (1) hour of initial substance abuse training and education shall be required as part of the certified miner’s first annual retraining conducted in a classroom that occurs after August 1, 2006. This requirement shall not apply to certified persons who received the one (1) hour initial substance abuse training and education as part of their forty (40) hour or twenty-four (24) hour new miner training.

In addition to the thirty (30) minutes of annual alcohol and substance abuse education required for certified miners, supervisory personnel shall be required to receive an additional thirty (30) minutes of alcohol and substance abuse awareness training annually.

Beginning with the first full calendar year after the effective date established by the department and during each calendar year thereafter, each certified miner shall receive at least sixteen (16) hours of retraining and reeducation.

Newly hired experienced miner training shall satisfy the miner’s annual retraining requirement if a time lapse occurs between the miner’s last training anniversary date and the next scheduled training anniversary date for the mine where he is newly employed, if the miner has complied with the annual retraining requirements within the last twelve (12) months from the date of his newly hired experienced miner training.

Retraining and reeducation sessions shall be conducted at times and in numbers to reasonably assure each certified miner an opportunity to attend.

The licensee shall pay all certified miners their regular wages and benefits while they receive training required by the department.

Willful failure of a working miner to complete annual retraining and reeducation requirements shall constitute grounds for revocation, suspension, or probation of his certificate.

If the department discovers a miner working without proper training or the licensee cannot provide proof of training, the miner shall be withdrawn immediately from the mine and the licensee shall pay the miner his regular wages until the training is administered and properly documented.

When employment is terminated, the licensee shall provide the employee a copy of his training records, upon request. If the employee does not request his training records immediately, the licensee shall, within fifteen (15) days, provide the employee with those training records.

The department may, upon its own motion or whenever requested to do so by the commissioner, deem applicable certificates issued by other states to be proof of training and education equal to the requirements of KRS

351.102

or deem training provided by appropriate federal agencies to be adequate to meet training and education requirements established by the department , if the training and education meet the minimum requirements of this chapter.

The secretary may promulgate administrative regulations necessary to establish a program to implement the provisions of this chapter according to the criteria and standards established by the department. This program shall include but not be limited to implementation of a program of instruction and the conduct of examinations to test each applicant’s knowledge and understanding of the training and instruction.

The commissioner shall keep and maintain current records on all certified miners, all of which shall be maintained by computer for ready access. The commissioner shall not grant certification to any person that, at the time of application, had his or her miner certification, foreman certification, electrician certification, or any other mining specialty certification suspended or revoked by another state. If a person has his or her miner certification, foreman certification, electrician certification, or other mining specialty certification probated in another state, the commissioner may, at his or her discretion, grant the equivalent certification. However, that certification shall be placed on probation in Kentucky until the probationary period in the other state has expired.

The commissioner is authorized and directed to utilize state mine safety specialists, private and public institutions of education, and other qualified persons available to him in implementing the program of instruction and examination.

The commissioner is authorized and directed to utilize state and federal moneys and personnel that may be available to the department for educational and training purposes in the implementation of the provisions of this chapter.

All training and education required by this section may be conducted in classrooms, on the job, or in simulated mines.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 8 § 6; 1996, ch. 308, § 8, effective April 9, 1996; 2000, ch. 68, § 2, effective July 14, 2000; 2001, ch. 149, § 9, effective March 20, 2001; 2002, ch. 355, § 4, effective July 15, 2002; 2006, ch. 241, § 13, effective July 12, 2006; 2007, ch. 94, § 7, effective June 26, 2007; 2015 ch. 87, § 16, effective June 24, 2015; 2017 ch. 117, § 36, effective June 29, 2017.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(4/9/96). The action taken with respect to this statute by 1996 Ky. Acts ch. 308 was to have become effective April 8, 1996, under Section 51 of that Act. The Act, however, did not become effective until April 9, 1996, when the Governor’s signed copy of the Act was filed with the Secretary of State.

351.107.
Requirements for certification as shotfirer.

A person desiring to obtain experience as a shotfirer may not charge or detonate explosives in an underground mine unless he or she is under the direction and within sight and sound of a certified shotfirer. No person shall charge or detonate explosives within an underground mine unless that person has successfully completed a training program and passed a test administered by the department. The test shall include at a minimum a determination of the person’s ability to test for mine gases and to safely handle and detonate explosives in an underground coal mine.

The commissioner shall issue a shotfirer’s certificate to the person upon successfully passing the test.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 8, § 7; 1996, ch. 308, § 9, effective April 9, 1996; 2000, ch. 104, § 8, effective July 14, 2000.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(4/9/96). The action taken with respect to this statute by 1996 Ky. Acts ch. 308 was to have become effective April 8, 1996, under Section 51 of that Act. The Act, however, did not become effective until April 9, 1996, when the Governor’s signed copy of the Act was filed with the Secretary of State.

351.1071.
Training program — Certification as shotfirer and driller for solid blasting.

No person shall drill coal or detonate explosives within a mine using the method of shooting coal from the solid until that person successfully completes a training program administered by the department and has passed a test prescribed by the commissioner.

No person shall be issued a certificate in accordance with subsection (1) of this section unless he or she presents valid evidence to the commissioner of having one (1) year of practical underground coal mine experience.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 370, § 1, effective July 15, 1982.

351.108.
Superintendent to hold a mine foreman certificate.

Mine superintendents shall hold a mine foreman certificate issued by the commissioner.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 8, § 8; 1996, ch. 308, § 10, effective April 9, 1996; 2000, ch. 104, § 9, effective July 14, 2000.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(4/9/96). The action taken with respect to this statute by 1996 Ky. Acts ch. 308 was to have become effective April 8, 1996, under Section 51 of that Act. The Act, however, did not become effective until April 9, 1996, when the Governor’s signed copy of the Act was filed with the Secretary of State.

351.109.
Requirements for qualification and certification to perform electrical work — Written tests.

An individual is a qualified and certified person, within the meaning of this chapter, to perform electrical work, other than work on energized surface, high voltage lines, if he has at least one (1) year of experience under direct supervision of a qualified electrician in performing electrical work underground in a coal mine, in the surface work areas of an underground coal mine, in a surface coal mine, in a noncoal mine, in the mine equipment manufacturing industry, or in any other industry using or manufacturing similar equipment, and he attains a satisfactory grade on each of the series of written tests administered by the department and required in subsection (2) of this section.

The series of written tests shall include, but not be limited to, the following subjects:

Direct current theory and application;

Alternating current theory and application;

Electric equipment and circuits;

Permissibility of electric equipment;

Requirements of both federal and state laws; and

Pertinent sections of the National Electrical Code.

A score of at least eighty (80) percent on each of the written tests shall be deemed to be a satisfactory grade. Recognition shall be given to practical experience in that one (1) percentage point shall be added to an individual’s score in each test for each additional year of experience beyond the one (1) year minimum requirement specified in subsection (1) of this section; however, in no case shall an individual be given more than five (5) percentage points for such practical experience.

An individual may, within thirty (30) days from the date on which he received notification from the department of his test scores, repeat those sections on which he received an unsatisfactory score. If further retesting is necessary after this initial repetition, a minimum of thirty (30) days from the date of receipt of notification of the initial retest scores shall elapse prior to such further retesting, whereupon the entire series of written tests shall be retaken.

An individual qualified and certified in accordance with this section shall, in order to retain qualification and certification, satisfactorily complete annually a retraining program approved by the department.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 8, § 9; 1980, ch. 205, § 1, effective July 1, 1980; 1994, ch. 156, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 2000, ch. 104, § 10, effective July 14, 2000.

351.110.
Examination prerequisites — Fees — Moneys from licenses and examination fees for use of department.

The department shall not admit any applicant for certification as a mine inspector, mine safety analyst, electrical inspector, mine safety instructor, mine foreman, or assistant mine foreman to take an examination given by it unless the applicant has the experience required by this chapter, and has submitted proof that he or she is drug and alcohol free in accordance with KRS

351.182

and

351.183

, and has presented to the examiner at the time of registration for the examination a United States postal money order or certified check in the amount of fifty dollars ($50). All money orders or certified checks required herein shall be made payable to the State Treasurer, Frankfort, Kentucky.

All money paid to the State Treasurer for licenses and fees required by this chapter shall be for the sole use of the department and shall be in addition to any moneys appropriated by the General Assembly for the use of the department.

The department may refuse to examine any applicant who cannot readily understand the written English language or cannot express himself intelligently in English, or who is obviously intoxicated.

HISTORY:

2739-45: amend. Acts 1952, ch. 162, § 8; 1972, ch. 298, § 8; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 8, § 10; 1978, ch. 301, § 5, effective June 17, 1978; 1986, ch. 16, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 1996, ch. 308, § 11, effective April 9, 1996; 2006, ch. 241, § 14, effective July 12, 2006; 2017 ch. 117, § 37, effective June 29, 2017.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(4/9/96). The action taken with respect to this statute by 1996 Ky. Acts ch. 308 was to have become effective April 8, 1996, under Section 51 of that Act. The Act, however, did not become effective until April 9, 1996, when the Governor’s signed copy of the Act was filed with the Secretary of State.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Receipts of budget units to be paid into state treasury, KRS

41.070

.

351.120.
Issuance of certificates — Form and content — Classification — Duty of applicant — Drug- or alcohol-test-related suspension or revocation of certification or license — Notification of options — Reissuance after evaluation, treatment, and testing.

The commissioner shall issue a certificate to each person who possesses the qualifications required by law for mine inspector, electrical inspector, surface or underground mine safety instructor, surface mine safety analyst, assistant mine foreman, mine foreman, shotfirer, and other mining specialties as established by the department, or miner who has passed the examination given by direction of the department for that position, and who has met the requirements for drug- and alcohol-free status.

The certificate shall be in such form as the commissioner prescribes, shall be signed by the commissioner, and shall show that the holder has passed the required examination and possesses the qualifications required by law for mine inspector, electrical inspector, surface or underground mine safety instructor, surface mine safety analyst, assistant mine foreman, mine foreman, shotfirer, and other mining specialties as established by the department, or miner and is authorized to act as such.

Certificates issued to mine foremen and assistant mine foremen shall be classified as follows:

Mine foreman certificates, authorizing the holder to act as foreman for all classes of coal mines; and

Assistant mine foreman certificates, authorizing the holder to act as assistant foreman.

Any mine foreman or assistant mine foreman may act as a fire boss or mine examiner. This shall not apply to persons holding a second class mine foreman certificate issued before June 16, 1972.

The class of mine foreman’s certificate awarded shall be determined by the department according to the experience of the applicant.

No certificate shall be granted to any person who does not present to the department satisfactory evidence, in the form of affidavits, that the applicant has had the required practical experience in underground or surface coal mines. A data sheet shall be filed by each applicant showing places of employment, beginning month and year and ending month and year employed by each company and list jobs performed, showing at least the number of required years. Affidavit and data sheet forms shall be furnished by the department. The applicant also shall submit proof that he or she is drug and alcohol free. The proof shall be submitted in accordance with KRS

351.182

and

351.183

. For the purpose of this section, persons holding a four (4) year degree in mining engineering from a recognized institution shall be credited with the equivalent of two (2) years of practical experience in coal mines when applying for any mine foreman or assistant mine foreman certificate. Persons holding an associate degree in mining from a recognized institution shall be credited with the equivalent of two (2) years’ experience when applying for a mine foreman certificate and one (1) year when applying for an assistant mine foreman certificate. Persons desiring to use their mining engineering or mining technology degree as credit for practical experience toward a mine foreman or assistant mine foreman certificate shall file proof of having received their degree prior to the examination.

Applicants for an underground mine foreman certificate shall have five (5) years’ practical underground coal mining experience acquired after achieving the age of eighteen (18), with at least one (1) year of this experience acquired on an active working section of an underground mine. Applicants for an underground assistant mine foreman certificate shall have three (3) years’ practical underground experience acquired after achieving the age of eighteen (18), with at least one (1) year of this experience acquired on an active working section of an underground mine.

Applicants for surface mine foremen certification shall have three (3) years’ practical surface mine experience acquired after achieving the age of eighteen (18); for surface mine foreman certification with a specialty in coal extraction, at least one (1) year of the required practical experience shall have been acquired from direct involvement in the mining or extraction of coal at a surface mine. For a surface mine foreman certification with a specialty in postmining activities, at least one (1) year of the required experience shall have been acquired from direct involvement in the performance of such activities at a surface or underground mine, coal preparation plant, or other coal-handling facility. Notwithstanding any requirement in this subsection to the contrary, a person having three (3) years’ of underground or surface mining experience shall qualify for a surface mine foreman certification with a specialty in postmining activities if the person has documented experience of at least one (1) year in the performance of these activities. Persons holding a surface mine foreman certificate prior to July 15, 1998, are not affected by this section.

Persons possessing certificates of qualifications to act as mine inspector, mine foreman, assistant mine foreman, or fire boss prior to July 15, 1982, are not affected by this section.

When approved by the commissioner, a person who has successfully completed any mine foreman or assistant mine foreman examination and submitted proof that he or she is drug and alcohol free in accordance with KRS

351.182

and

351.183

may be granted a temporary certification that is valid only until the department acts upon his or her certification at its next regularly scheduled meeting.

A member of the supervisory personnel shall be present at the working section except in cases of emergencies at all times employees under his supervision are at the working section on coal-producing shifts.

The commissioner immediately shall suspend any certification for violation of drug- and alcohol-free status or for failure or refusal to submit to a drug and alcohol test authorized by KRS

351.182

,

351.183

,

351.184

,

351.185

, and

352.180

. The commissioner shall, by certified mail, notify the holder of the certification of his or her suspension and of the following:

The right to pursue one (1) of the following options:

Appeal the suspension to the Mine Safety Review Commission within thirty (30) days of the notification; or

Notify the commissioner of the Department for Natural Resources or the director of the Division of Mine Safety within thirty (30) days of the notification that the holder intends to be evaluated by a medical professional trained in substance treatment, to complete any prescribed treatment, and to submit an acceptable result from a drug and alcohol test as required by KRS

351.182

;

Failure to file an appeal or failure to notify the commissioner of the Department for Natural Resources or the director of the Division of Mine Safety of the holder’s intent to comply with paragraph (a)2. of this subsection within thirty (30) days of the notification shall result in the revocation of all licenses and certifications issued by the Division of Mine Safety for a period of not less than three (3) years, and the holder shall remain ineligible for any other certification issued by the Division of Mine Safety during the revocation period. Certifications and licenses revoked under this paragraph may be reissued by:

Compliance with all training and testing requirements;

Satisfying the requirements of KRS 351.182 and

351.183

; and

Compliance with all orders of the Mine Safety Review Commission; and

The completion of the evaluation, treatment, and submission of an acceptable drug test pursuant to paragraph (a)2. of this subsection or the revocation described under paragraph (b) of this subsection shall be considered a first offense.

The licenses and certifications of a miner who notifies the commissioner of the Department for Natural Resources or the director of the Division of Mine Safety of his or her intent to comply with subsection (12)(a)2. of this section shall remain suspended until the miner has provided proof of the evaluation and successful completion of any prescribed treatment and has submitted a negative drug and alcohol test as required by KRS

351.182

to the division. The drug and alcohol test shall be taken no more than thirty (30) days prior to the submission of the proof required by this section. Upon receipt and review of the proof by the division, the miner’s licenses and certifications shall be restored. In the event that the miner fails to successfully complete the evaluation, treatment, and drug test within one hundred twenty (120) days of his or her notification pursuant to subsection (12)(a)2. of this section, the miner’s licenses and certifications issued by the division shall be revoked for a period prescribed under KRS 351.990(8). The one hundred twenty (120) day time period set out in this section shall be extended upon proof that the miner is complying with the recommendations of the medical professional.

If the suspension described in subsection (12) of this section occurs following the miner’s first offense as described in this section or KRS

351.184

, the notification sent to the miner shall not include the option of notifying the division of the miner’s intent to seek an evaluation and treatment. The miner shall only have the right to appeal the suspension to the Mine Safety Review Commission within thirty (30) days of notification. If the miner fails to appeal the suspension, the penalty shall be assessed according to KRS 351.990(8)(b) or (c).

HISTORY:

2737-1, 2739-38, 2739-44, 2739-45: amend. Acts 1952, ch. 162, § 9; 1972, ch. 298, § 9; 1974, ch. 386, § 65; 1976, ch. 174, § 2; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 8, §§ 1-6, 8-10; 1978, ch. 301, § 6, effective June 17, 1978; 1982, ch. 370, § 4, effective July 15, 1982; 1996, ch. 308, § 12, effective April 9, 1996; 1998, ch. 481, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 104, § 11, effective July 14, 2000; 2006, ch. 241, § 15, effective April 22, 2006; 2012, ch. 89, § 2, effective July 12, 2012; 2015 ch. 87, § 17, effective June 24, 2015; 2017 ch. 117, § 38, effective June 29, 2017.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(4/9/96). The action taken with respect to this statute by 1996 Ky. Acts ch. 308 was to have become effective April 8, 1996, under Section 51 of that Act. The Act, however, did not become effective until April 9, 1996, when the Governor’s signed copy of the Act was filed with the Secretary of State.

351.122.
Reciprocity for miners certified in other states — Requirements — Reciprocal disciplinary action.

In lieu of an examination prescribed by law or regulation, the department may enter into a reciprocal agreement with another state regarding the certification of miners. The department may, pursuant to a reciprocal agreement, issue to any person holding a certificate issued by another state a certificate permitting him or her to perform similar tasks in the Commonwealth if:

The department finds that the requirements for certification in the other state are substantially equivalent to those of Kentucky;

The person passes only the applicable part of the examination with regard to Kentucky law which is uniquely different from the other state;

The person has submitted proof, in accordance with KRS

351.182

, that he or she is drug and alcohol free;

The person’s retraining is sufficient to meet Kentucky requirements; and

The person’s certification in Kentucky or in any other state has not been suspended, revoked, or probated.

Upon receipt of notice from a reciprocal state of a disciplinary action relating to any of the certifications or licenses issued to a miner who also holds corresponding licenses or certifications issued by the Division of Mine Safety, the commissioner shall impose analogous sanctions against the miner’s Kentucky licenses or certifications. These sanctions shall terminate upon proof of compliance with the orders from the reciprocal state.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2007, ch. 41, § 1, effective June 26, 2007; 2012, ch. 89, § 3, effective July 12, 2012; 2015 ch. 87, § 18, effective June 24, 2015; 2017 ch. 117, § 39, effective June 29, 2017.

351.125.
First-aid training.

The department shall provide first-aid training incorporating all training required by the state’s approved program for emergency medical technicians or the department’s mine emergency technician program which is applicable to mines. Each candidate for certification as a mine foreman shall complete the department’s first-aid course of instruction and shall pass an examination on the course as a prerequisite for certification.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 8, § 14; 1998, ch. 480, § 2, effective July 15, 1998; 2017 ch. 117, § 40, effective June 29, 2017.

351.127.
Employment of certified emergency medical technicians or mine emergency technicians required at underground coal mine.

Certified emergency medical technicians or mine emergency technicians shall be employed at every licensed coal mine whose employees are actively engaged in the extraction, production, or preparation of coal. Persons employed as mine emergency technicians shall be trained in a manner established in an administrative regulation promulgated by the department. Persons seeking certification as a mine emergency medical technician or mine emergency technician shall be subject to the following additional requirements:

All persons seeking certification as a mine emergency technician shall demonstrate drug- and alcohol-free status in accordance with KRS

351.182

and

351.183

;

The drug and alcohol testing for those seeking certification as mine emergency technicians shall be administered prior to the examination for the certification, in accordance with KRS

351.182

and

351.183

; and

Certification as a mine emergency technician shall not be issued until the results of the drug and alcohol testing have been obtained. Notification shall be given to the person in accordance with KRS

351.184

.

These emergency medical technicians or mine emergency technicians shall be employed in the following manner:

At least two (2) emergency medical or mine emergency technicians shall be employed on every shift engaged in the production of coal, and at least one (1) emergency medical or mine emergency technician shall be employed on every nonproduction shift;

For underground mines, at least one (1) of the two (2) emergency or mine emergency technicians shall be underground at all times while miners are working in the mines. An additional emergency medical technician or mine emergency technician shall be employed for every additional fifty (50), or any portion thereof, employees per shift who are actively engaged in the extraction, production, or preparation of coal.

If these emergency medical technicians or mine emergency technicians are also employed in other capacities at the coal mine, they shall be available for quick response to emergencies and shall have available to them at all times the equipment necessary to respond to emergencies, as prescribed by the commissioner.

If the licensee selects existing employees to be trained as emergency medical technicians or mine emergency technicians, the employees selected shall be paid their regular wages during training.

Certified emergency medical technicians and mine emergency technicians shall receive annual retraining in the manner established in an administrative regulation promulgated by the department, during which they shall receive their regular wages.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 369, § 1, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 148, § 1, effective July 13, 1984; 1984, ch. 237, § 1, effective July 13, 1984; 1990, ch. 145, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 1994, ch. 259, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 308, § 13, effective April 9, 1996; 2002, ch. 355, § 5, effective July 15, 2002; 2006, ch. 241, § 16, effective July 12, 2006; 2007, ch. 94, § 8, effective June 26, 2007.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(4/9/96). The action taken with respect to this statute by 1996 Ky. Acts ch. 308 was to have become effective April 8, 1996, under Section 51 of that Act. The Act, however, did not become effective until April 9, 1996, when the Governor’s signed copy of the Act was filed with the Secretary of State.

351.128.
Underground mine employing 2 to 25 persons required to employ person with first-aid training. [Repealed.]

351.129.
First-aid instruction for surface coal miners — Certification — Annual retraining. [Repealed.]

351.1291.
Course of instruction for surface coal miners.

All inexperienced surface coal miners shall complete a twenty-four (24) hour course of instruction composed of sixteen (16) hours of classroom training and eight (8) hours of mine specifics that is devised or approved by the department in subjects including but not limited to: accident prevention, cutting and welding, equipment operation, fire protection, first-aid methods, ground control and transportation, handling and use of explosives, mine communications, mine electrical safety standards, mining law, including the statutory rights of miners, safety around bins and hoppers, alcohol and substance abuse education and training, and any other subjects deemed appropriate by the department. For purposes of this section, “inexperienced coal miners” means all persons who have not previously worked at least forty-five (45) days at a surface coal mine in this Commonwealth.

All surface coal miners shall complete an eight (8) hour course of annual retraining devised or approved by the department in the subjects identified in subsection (1) of this section, thirty (30) minutes of which shall be dedicated to alcohol and substance abuse education.

One (1) hour of initial substance abuse training and education shall be provided as part of the certified miner’s first annual retraining conducted in a classroom that occurs after August 1, 2006. This requirement does not apply to a certified person who received the one (1) hour initial substance abuse training and education as part of his or her forty (40) hour or twenty-four (24) hour new miner training.

In addition to the thirty (30) minutes of annual alcohol and substance abuse education required for certified miners, supervisory personnel shall be required to undergo an additional thirty (30) minutes of alcohol and substance abuse awareness training annually.

Each applicant for a certified surface miner, in addition to meeting the educational requirements of this chapter, shall pass a drug and alcohol test in accordance with KRS

351.182

and

351.183

.

The commissioner shall certify all surface coal miners who complete the courses of instruction and show proof of drug- and alcohol-free condition of certification required in this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 161, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 481, § 2, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 104, § 12, effective July 14, 2000; 2002, ch. 355, § 6, effective July 15, 2002; 2006, ch. 241, § 17, effective July 12, 2006.

351.130.
Duplicate certificates.

If any person loses his certificate or it is destroyed which was earned under KRS

351.120

, he shall apply to the commissioner for a duplicate certificate, including with his application an affidavit stating in full how the certificate was destroyed or misplaced. If the commissioner deems it proper he shall furnish the applicant with a duplicate certificate. Any person applying for a duplicate certificate shall pay a fee of five dollars ($5) to the State Treasurer.

History.

2739-45: amend. Acts 1952, ch. 162, § 10; 1972, ch. 298, § 10.